Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PROGRESS PARKWAY; EVELETH; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $8,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for one or more grants to St. Louis County for predesign, design, engineering, environmental analysis and mitigation, land acquisition, construction, and reconstruction of Progress Parkway to provide for intersection improvements and road realignment and extension from marked U.S. Highway 53 and St. Louis County State-Aid Highway 142 to marked Trunk Highway 37 and Station 44 Road in the city of Eveleth. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation for the same purpose in Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 17, subdivision 17. This appropriation is onetime and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end